Massachusetts, session 194th, H1933.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 8A of Chapter 239 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting before
the first paragraph the following:-
Section 8A(a). As used in this section and in Chapter 239, the following words shall,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
"Tenant,” a person who holds possession of a premises in exchange for consideration
given to an owner;
"Subtenant," a person who holds possession of a premises in exchange for consideration
given to a Tenant or other Subtenant;

of 2

"Consideration," money or services whether pursuant to a written or verbal agreement or
domestic relationship.
of 2